District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.05

Definitions.

For the purpose of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Earned income” means income in cash or in kind produced as a result of the performance of services currently rendered by an individual. In the case of an applicant or recipient of TANF, the term “earned income” shall not include the amount of earned income credit payments actually received.

(2)

“Family” means the total applicant or assistance unit.

(3)

“Gross income” means total earned income before any deductions required by law.

(4)

“Income” means earned or unearned money received by an individual that is of gain or benefit to the individual or assistance unit. The term “income” includes the following: wages; salary; gross income from self-employment; training allowances, stipends or other payments for work experience (to the extent that they are countable as income pursuant to § 4-205.13a); District public assistance payments; federal public assistance payments (to the extent permitted under federal law); pensions; retirement benefits; annuities; unemployment compensation; worker’s compensation; child support or alimony payments made directly to a member of the assistance unit from someone who is not a member of the assistance unit; interest; dividends; scholarships; rent received from a tenant or lessee; and money that is required by District or federal law to be deemed from a person who is not a member of the assistance unit. The term “income” does not include: a non-recurring lump-sum payment (which shall be considered a resource); payments made by a government agency to a third party for child care, housing, or medical assistance; a relocation payment under § 42-2851.05; or any payment that is specifically excluded by federal or District law from consideration as income for the purpose of determining eligibility for public assistance.

(5)

“Mandatory deductions” means those deductions required by law or as a condition of employment.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 505, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-150, § 2(a), 31 DCR 6425
Sept. 10, 1985, D.C. Law 6-35, § 2(b), 32 DCR 3778
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-86, § 2(a), 37 DCR 48
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(j), 46 DCR 905
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114,§ 292(b), 49 DCR 1468
1981 Ed., § 3-205.5.
D.C. Law 14-114, in par. (4), substituted “payments made by a government agency to a third party for child care, housing, or medical assistance; a relocation payment under § 42-2851.05;” for “payments made by a government agency to a third party for child care, housing, or medical assistance;”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(j) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(j) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(j) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).